Maryland, session 2026, HB1250.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Commercial Law
13–301.
Unfair, abusive, or deceptive trade practices include any:
(14) Violation of a provision of:
(xlvii) Title 14, Subtitle 50 of this article; [or]
(xlviii) Section 13–411.1(c)(2) of the Transportation Article; or
(XLIX) TITLE 14, SUBTITLE 51 OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
SUBTITLE 51. CHATBOTS.
14–5101.
(A) IN THIS SUBTITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.

HOUSE BILL 1250 3
(B) “ADVERTISEMENT” MEANS A WRITTEN STATEMENT, AN ORAL
STATEMENT, AN ILLUSTRATION, OR A DEPICTION DISPLAYED IN EXCHANGE FOR
MONEY OR OTHER CONSIDERATION, INCLUDING ACCESS TO DATA, THAT PROMOTES
THE PURCHASE OR USE OF A GOOD OR A SERVICE OR INTEREST IN A BRAND, A GOOD,
OR A SERVICE.
(C) “AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT” MEANS AN AFFIRMATIVE ACT SIGNIFYING A
USER’S FREELY GIVEN, UNAMBIGUOUS, AND INFORMED AUTHORIZATION IN
RESPONSE TO A SPECIFIC REQUEST FROM A CHATBOT AND IN ACCORDANCE WITH §
14–5102 OF THIS SUBTITLE.
(D) “ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” OR “AI” MEANS AN ENGINEERED OR
MACHINE–BASED SYSTEM THAT VARIES IN ITS LEVEL OF AUTONOMY AND THAT CAN,
FOR EXPLICIT OR IMPLICIT OBJECTIVES, INFER FROM THE INPUT IT RECEIVES HOW
TO GENERATE OUTPUTS THAT CAN INFLUENCE PHYSICAL OR VIRTUAL
ENVIRONMENTS.
(E) “CHATBOT” MEANS A GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM
WITH A NATURAL LANGUAGE INTERFACE THAT PROVIDES ADAPTIVE RESPONSES TO
USER INPUTS.
(F) “CHAT LOG” MEANS A RECORD OF:
(1) INPUT DATA; AND
(2) SYNTHETIC CONTENT GENERATED BY A CHATBOT AND SHARED
WITH THE USER.
(G) “COLLECT” MEANS TO CREATE, BUY, RENT, GATHER, OBTAIN, RECEIVE,
ACCESS, OR OTHERWISE ACQUIRE PERSONAL DATA OR INPUT DATA BY ANY MEANS
THROUGH A USER’S INTERACTIONS WITH A CHATBOT.
(H) “DE–IDENTIFIED DATA” MEANS DATA HANDLED IN ACCORDANCE WITH
§ 14–5103 OF THIS SUBTITLE THAT CANNOT REASONABLY BE:
(1) USED TO INFER INFORMATION ABOUT A USER; OR
(2) LINKED TO AN IDENTIFIABLE USER.
(I) “DEVELOPER” MEANS A PERSON THAT DESIGNS AND CREATES A
CHATBOT THAT AN OPERATOR MAKES AVAILABLE TO A USER IN THE STATE.

HOUSE BILL 1250
(J) “GENERATIVE ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE” MEANS AN ARTIFICIAL
INTELLIGENCE SYSTEM THAT CAN GENERATE SYNTHETIC CONTENT INCLUDING
TEXT, AN IMAGE, A VIDEO, OR AUDIO DERIVED FROM THE AI SYSTEM’S TRAINING
DATA.
(K) “INPUT DATA” MEANS INFORMATION AND CONTENT INCLUDING TEXT,
AN IMAGE, A VIDEO, OR AUDIO THAT A USER MAKES AVAILABLE TO A CHATBOT.
(L) “OPERATOR” MEANS A PERSON, INCLUDING A DEVELOPER, THAT
MAKES AVAILABLE A CHATBOT TO A USER IN THE STATE.
(M) (1) “PERSONAL DATA” MEANS INFORMATION THAT IS LINKED OR MAY
REASONABLY BE LINKED TO A USER.
(2) “PERSONAL DATA” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) DE–IDENTIFIED DATA; OR
(II) INFORMATION THAT IS LAWFULLY AVAILABLE TO THE
GENERAL PUBLIC:
1. AS A RESULT OF A DISCLOSURE BY OR THROUGH ANY
UNIT OF GOVERNMENT IN ACCORDANCE WITH APPLICABLE LAWS AND
REGULATIONS; OR
2. AS WIDELY DISTRIBUTED INFORMATION.
(N) “PROCESS” MEANS THE USE, STORAGE, ANALYSIS, DISCLOSURE,
DELETION, OR MODIFICATION OF INPUT DATA, INCLUDING PERSONAL DATA.
(O) (1) “PROFILE” MEANS PROCESSING PERFORMED ON INPUT DATA,
INCLUDING PERSONAL DATA, TO DETECT AND CLASSIFY OR DESIGNATE
PERSONALITY AND BEHAVIORAL CHARACTERISTICS OF A USER.
(2) “PROFILE” DOES NOT INCLUDE PROCESSING CHAT LOGS FOR
USER SAFETY PURPOSES OR AS REQUIRED BY LAW.
(P) “SELL” MEANS THE EXCHANGE OF INPUT DATA, INCLUDING PERSONAL
DATA, FOR MONEY OR OTHER CONSIDERATION.
(Q) (1) “TRAINING” MEANS THE USE OF INPUT DATA AS TRAINING DATA
TO ADJUST OR MODIFY A CHATBOT.

HOUSE BILL 1250 5
(2) “TRAINING” DOES NOT INCLUDE:
(I) TESTING FOR USER SAFETY PURPOSES, INCLUDING FOR
RISKS OF HARM TO A USER;
(II) ADJUSTMENTS OR OTHER MODIFICATIONS TO ADDRESS
IDENTIFIED RISKS OF HARM TO A USER; OR
(III) ADJUSTMENTS OR OTHER MODIFICATIONS REQUIRED BY
LAW.
(R) “USER” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL WHO INTERACTS OR ENGAGES DIRECTLY
WITH A CHATBOT.
14–5102.
(A) IF A PROVISION OF THIS SUBTITLE REQUIRES A PERSON TO OBTAIN A
USER’S AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT, THE REQUEST FOR AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT:
(1) SHALL:
(I) BE PROVIDED IN A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS MANNER;
(II) BE REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE TO A USER WITH A
DISABILITY;
(III) BE AVAILABLE TO A USER IN EACH LANGUAGE IN WHICH
THE CHATBOT IS AVAILABLE TO THE USER; AND
(IV) CONTAIN AN OPTION TO REFUSE TO PROVIDE AFFIRMATIVE
CONSENT THAT IS AT LEAST AS PROMINENT AS, AND CONSISTS OF NOT MORE THAN
THE SAME NUMBER OF STEPS THAN, THE OPTION TO PROVIDE AFFIRMATIVE
CONSENT; AND
(2) MAY NOT:
(I) INFER FROM A USER’S INACTION OR CONTINUED USE OF
THE CHATBOT THAT THE USER PROVIDES AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT;
(II) BE PART OF THE CHATBOT’S GENERAL TERMS OF USE; OR
(III) BE OFFERED USING A USER INTERFACE DESIGNED OR
MANIPULATED WITH THE SUBSTANTIAL EFFECT OF SUBVERTING OR IMPAIRING THE

HOUSE BILL 1250
AUTONOMY, DECISION MAKING, OR CHOICE OF A USER, SUCH AS A PRACTICE
CONSIDERED TO BE A DARK PATTERN BY THE FEDERAL TRADE COMMISSION.
(B) IF A PERSON OBTAINS A USER’S CONSENT BY USE OF A MATERIALLY
FALSE OR MISLEADING STATEMENT OR REPRESENTATION, THE USER’S CONSENT IS
VOID AND UNENFORCEABLE.
14–5103.
FOR INFORMATION TO BE CONSIDERED DE–IDENTIFIED DATA UNDER THIS
SUBTITLE, THE OPERATOR SHALL:
(1) ENSURE AND PUBLICLY COMMIT IN A CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS
MANNER THAT AGGREGATED DATA MAY NOT BE USED TO INFER INFORMATION
ABOUT A USER OR ESTABLISH A LINK TO AN IDENTIFIABLE USER; AND
(2) CONTRACTUALLY OBLIGATE A THIRD PARTY THAT RECEIVES
DATA FROM AN OPERATOR TO ENSURE THAT AGGREGATED DATA MAY NOT BE USED
TO INFER INFORMATION ABOUT A USER OR ESTABLISH A LINK TO AN IDENTIFIABLE
USER.
14–5104.
(A) AN OPERATOR MAY NOT MAKE AVAILABLE TO A USER IN THE STATE A
CHATBOT THAT IS CAPABLE OF:
(1) SUBJECT TO SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION:
(I) USING INPUT DATA AS TRAINING DATA FOR THE CHATBOT,
UNLESS THE USER PROVIDES AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT; OR
(II) PROCESSING OR USING PERSONAL DATA OTHER THAN
INPUT DATA AS TRAINING DATA FOR THE CHATBOT, UNLESS NECESSARY TO
RESPOND TO A USER PROMPT AND THE USER PROVIDES AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT;
(2) PROCESSING A USER’S CHAT LOG TO:
(I) DETERMINE WHETHER TO DISPLAY AN ADVERTISEMENT
FOR A GOOD OR A SERVICE TO THE USER; OR
(II) CUSTOMIZE AN ADVERTISEMENT DISPLAYED TO THE USER;

HOUSE BILL 1250 7
(3) PROFILING A USER OTHER THAN FOR WHAT IS NECESSARY TO
RESPOND TO A USER PROMPT;
(4) RETAINING A CHAT LOG FOR LONGER THAN 10 YEARS, UNLESS
REQUIRED BY LAW; OR
(5) PROVIDING ADVICE OR A SERVICE THAT AN INDIVIDUAL CANNOT
LAWFULLY PROVIDE WITHOUT A LICENSE, INCLUDING FINANCIAL, LEGAL, OR
MEDICAL ADVICE, IN VIOLATION OF APPLICABLE STATE LICENSING LAWS.
(B) IF AN OPERATOR OR A DEVELOPER KNOWS OR REASONABLY SHOULD
KNOW THAT A USER IS A MINOR WHO IS UNDER THE AGE OF 13 YEARS, UNLESS THE
USER’S PARENT OR GUARDIAN PROVIDES WRITTEN AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT TO THE
OPERATOR OR THE DEVELOPER, THE OPERATOR AND THE DEVELOPER MAY NOT:
(1) USE INPUT DATA AS TRAINING DATA FOR THE CHATBOT; OR
(2) PROCESS PERSONAL DATA OTHER THAN INPUT DATA.
14–5105.
(A) A DEVELOPER SHALL ESTABLISH AND AN OPERATOR SHALL PROVIDE
TO A USER OF THE OPERATOR’S CHATBOT CLEAR AND CONSPICUOUS WARNINGS
THAT CHATBOTS ARE ARTIFICIALLY GENERATED AND NOT HUMAN USING BOTH:
(1) A STATIC, PERSISTENT WARNING THAT CONTINUOUSLY APPEARS
ON THE SCREEN; AND
(2) A DYNAMIC WARNING THAT POPS UP ON THE SCREEN AND
REQUIRES THE USER TO RESPOND:
(I) AT THE START OF A USER’S INTERACTION WITH A CHATBOT;
(II) AFTER EVERY HOUR OF A USER’S CONTINUOUS
INTERACTION WITH A CHATBOT; AND
(III) WHEN PROMPTED BY A USER IN A MANNER THAT
QUESTIONS HOW THE CHATBOT FUNCTIONS OR PROVIDES RESPONSES.
(B) A WARNING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF THIS SECTION SHALL
BE:

HOUSE BILL 1250
(1) AVAILABLE TO A USER IN EACH LANGUAGE IN WHICH THE
CHATBOT IS AVAILABLE TO THE USER;
(2) REASONABLY ACCESSIBLE TO A USER WITH A DISABILITY;
(3) PROMINENTLY DISPLAYED WITHIN THE INTERFACE; AND
(4) AT A MINIMUM, BASED ON A MODEL WARNING DEVELOPED BY THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL UNDER § 14–5111(1) OF THIS SUBTITLE.
14–5106.
A DEVELOPER SHALL ESTABLISH AND AN OPERATOR SHALL PROVIDE TO A
USER OF THE OPERATOR’S CHATBOT A MECHANISM FOR A USER TO INSPECT THE
USER’S CHAT LOG THAT THE OPERATOR HAS RETAINED IN A FORMAT THAT IS
PORTABLE, DOWNLOADABLE, AND HUMAN– AND MACHINE–READABLE.
14–5107.
(A) A DEVELOPER SHALL ESTABLISH AND AN OPERATOR SHALL PROVIDE:
(1) A COMPREHENSIVE DATA SECURITY PROGRAM THAT CONTAINS
ADMINISTRATIVE, TECHNICAL, AND PHYSICAL SAFEGUARDS THAT ARE
PROPORTIONATE TO THE VOLUME AND NATURE OF THE PERSONAL DATA AND CHAT
LOGS RETAINED BY THE OPERATOR; AND
(2) MONTHLY SAFETY TESTING.
(B) (1) AN OPERATOR SHALL PUBLISH A WRITTEN EXPLANATION OF THE
PROGRAM ESTABLISHED AND MAINTAINED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS
SECTION ON THE OPERATOR’S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE.
(2) EACH MONTH, AN OPERATOR SHALL PUBLISH THE FINDINGS OF
THE SAFETY TESTING REQUIRED UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(2) OF THIS SECTION ON
THE OPERATOR’S PUBLICLY ACCESSIBLE WEBSITE.
14–5108.
(A) AN OPERATOR OR A DEVELOPER MAY NOT:
(1) SELL A CHAT LOG;
(2) DISCRIMINATE OR RETALIATE AGAINST A USER FOR:

HOUSE BILL 1250 9
(I) REFUSING TO PROVIDE AFFIRMATIVE CONSENT AS
REQUIRED BY THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(II) ACCESSING OR REVIEWING A CHAT LOG AS ALLOWED BY
THIS SUBTITLE; OR
(3) ADVERTISE THAT A CHATBOT IS CAPABLE OF PROVIDING ADVICE
OR A SERVICE THAT AN INDIVIDUAL CANNOT LAWFULLY PROVIDE WITHOUT A
LICENSE, INCLUDING A REPRESENTATION THAT USER INPUTS OR CHAT LOGS ARE
PROTECTED BY AN INAPPLICABLE FIDUCIARY OR OTHER LEGAL DUTY OF
CONFIDENTIALITY.
(B) FOR PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION, THE DISCLOSURE OF INPUT DATA,
INCLUDING PERSONAL DATA, TO A THIRD PARTY RESPONSIBLE FOR PROCESSING
THE DATA IS NOT CONSIDERED SELLING A CHAT LOG.
14–5109.
(A) A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE IS:
(1) AN UNFAIR, ABUSIVE, OR DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE WITHIN
THE MEANING OF TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE; AND
(2) SUBJECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT AND PENALTY PROVISIONS
CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS ARTICLE.
(B) (1) IN ADDITION TO THE REMEDIES CONTAINED IN TITLE 13 OF THIS
ARTICLE:
(I) THE ATTORNEY GENERAL MAY BRING AN ACTION TO SEEK
DECLARATORY RELIEF;
(II) AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS
SUBTITLE MAY BRING AN ACTION TO SEEK AN INJUNCTION, DECLARATORY RELIEF,
OR DAMAGES IN ACCORDANCE WITH PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION; AND
(III) A CHATBOT SHALL BE CONSIDERED A PRODUCT FOR WHICH:
1. AN OPERATOR AND A DEVELOPER HAVE AN
AFFIRMATIVE DUTY TO ENSURE DOES NOT INJURE OR HARM A USER;

HOUSE BILL 1250
2. AN OPERATOR OR A DEVELOPER MAY BE HELD
STRICTLY LIABLE FOR CAUSING INJURY OR HARM TO A USER; AND
3. AN INDIVIDUAL MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR A DESIGN
DEFECT, A MANUFACTURING DEFECT, OR A MARKETING DEFECT.
(2) IN ADDITION TO COMPENSATORY DAMAGES AWARDED UNDER AN
ACTION TO RECOVER FOR INJURY OR LOSS UNDER § 13–408 OF THIS ARTICLE, A
COURT MAY ORDER A PERSON WHO KNOWINGLY VIOLATES THIS SUBTITLE TO PAY
AN INDIVIDUAL AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE PUNITIVE DAMAGES
NOT EXCEEDING THREE TIMES THE AMOUNT OF ANY ACTUAL DAMAGES RESULTING
FROM THE INJURY OR LOSS.
(C) IF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL RECOVERS A CIVIL PENALTY THAT IS NOT
PAYABLE TO AN INDIVIDUAL WHO IS AFFECTED BY A VIOLATION OF THIS SUBTITLE,
THE ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL DISTRIBUTE THE PENALTY TO THE BEHAVIORAL
HEALTH WORKFORCE INVESTMENT FUND ESTABLISHED UNDER § 10–1502 OF THE
HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
14–5110.
(A) THE DUTIES, OBLIGATIONS, AND REMEDIES UNDER THIS SUBTITLE:
(1) ARE IN ADDITION TO OTHER DUTIES, OBLIGATIONS, AND
REMEDIES PROVIDED UNDER ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW OR
REGULATION; AND
(2) MAY NOT BE CONSTRUED TO IMPAIR OR DENY ANY OTHER DUTY,
OBLIGATION, OR REMEDY PROVIDED UNDER ANY FEDERAL, STATE, OR LOCAL LAW
OR REGULATION.
(B) EXCEPT FOR § 14–5109 OF THIS SUBTITLE, THE REQUIREMENTS OF THIS
SUBTITLE APPLY TO ANY UNIT OF STATE AND LOCAL GOVERNMENT THAT DESIGNS,
CREATES, OR MAKES AVAILABLE A CHATBOT.
14–5111.
THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION OF THE OFFICE OF THE
ATTORNEY GENERAL SHALL ADOPT REGULATIONS TO CARRY OUT THE PROVISIONS
OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING:
(1) THE STANDARD CONTENT AND FORM OF A WARNING REQUIRED
UNDER § 14–5105 OF THIS SUBTITLE, INCLUDING MODEL WARNINGS;

HOUSE BILL 1250 11
(2) THE SPECIFIC PARAMETERS AND METRICS OF THE SECURITY
PROGRAM AND SAFETY TESTING REQUIRED UNDER § 14–5107(A) OF THIS SUBTITLE,
INCLUDING THE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS; AND
(3) A PLAN TO DISSEMINATE TO THE PUBLIC THE EDUCATIONAL
MATERIALS DEVELOPED BY THE BEHAVIORAL HEALTH ADMINISTRATION UNDER §
10–918 OF THE HEALTH – GENERAL ARTICLE.
14–5112.
THIS SUBTITLE MAY BE CITED AS THE CURBING HARMFUL AI TECHNOLOGY
ACT.
Article – Health – General
Part III. [Enforcement] MISCELLANEOUS.
10–918.
(A) THE ADMINISTRATION SHALL DEVELOP EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS
THAT CONTAIN INFORMATION:
(1) DESCRIBING HOW A PERSON MAY OBTAIN BEHAVIORAL HEALTH
CARE, AS DEFINED IN § 10–101 OF THIS TITLE, FROM A LICENSED MEDICAL
PROFESSIONAL IN THE STATE; AND
(2) ABOUT FREE OR LOW–COST SERVICES AVAILABLE TO
INDIVIDUALS IN THE STATE WHO ARE EXPERIENCING A MENTAL HEALTH CRISIS.
(B) THE EDUCATIONAL MATERIALS DEVELOPED UNDER SUBSECTION (A) OF
THIS SECTION SHALL BE:
(1) DISSEMINATED TO THE PUBLIC BY THE ATTORNEY GENERAL IN
ACCORDANCE WITH § 14–5111(3) OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE; AND
(2) USED FOR ANY OTHER PURPOSE AS DETERMINED BY THE
ADMINISTRATION.
10–1502.
(a) There is a Behavioral Health Workforce Investment Fund.
(e) The Fund shall consist of:

HOUSE BILL 1250
(1) CIVIL PENALTIES DISTRIBUTED TO THE FUND UNDER § 14–5109
OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE;
[(1)] (2) Money appropriated in the State budget to the Fund;
[(2)] (3) Interest earnings of the Fund; and
[(3)] (4) Any other money from any other source accepted for the benefit
of the Fund.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, if any provision of this Act or
the application of any provision of this Act to any person or circumstance is held invalid for
any reason in a court of competent jurisdiction, the invalidity does not affect other
provisions or any other application of this Act that can be given effect without the invalid
provision or application, and for this purpose the provisions of this Act are declared
severable.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026.